Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,215
Change of venue; costs.

Change of venue may be taken from the district court of the county in which the action is brought, as in other civil cases; and in every such case, all expenses of such trial which would be chargeable to the county in which the suit originated, had the cause been tried therein, as determined by the district judge of the county to which said cause has been transferred, shall be a charge upon the county in which the suit was commenced.

Laws 1877, § 17, p. 24;

R.S.1913, § 1192;

C.S.1922, § 1114;

C.S.1929, § 27-333;

Laws 1935, c. 43, § 2, p. 162;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-333;

R.S.1943, § 24-333;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-333.